Florida, session 2026, HB259.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (y) of subsection (1) of section
460.413, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
460.413 Grounds for disciplinary action; action by board
or department.—
(1) The following acts constitute grounds for denial of a
license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2):
(y) Failing to preserve identity of funds and property of
a patient, the value of which is greater than $501. As provided
by rule of the board, money or other property entrusted to a
chiropractic physician for a specific purpose, including
advances for costs and expenses of examination or treatment
which may not exceed the value of $1,500, is to be held in trust
and must be applied only to that purpose. Money and other
property of patients coming into the hands of a chiropractic
physician are not subject to counterclaim or setoff for
chiropractic physician's fees, and a refusal to account for and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb259-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 259 2026
deliver over such money and property upon demand shall be deemed
a conversion. This is not to preclude the retention of money or
other property upon which the chiropractic physician has a valid
lien for services or to preclude the payment of agreed fees from
the proceeds of transactions for examinations or treatments.
Controversies as to the amount of the fees are not grounds for
disciplinary proceedings unless the amount demanded is clearly
excessive or extortionate, or the demand is fraudulent. All
funds of patients paid to a chiropractic physician, other than
advances for costs and expenses, shall be deposited into one or
more identifiable bank accounts maintained in the state in which
the chiropractic physician's office is situated, and funds
belonging to the chiropractic physician may not be deposited
therein except as follows:
1. Funds reasonably sufficient to pay bank charges may be
deposited therein.
2. Funds belonging in part to a patient and in part
presently or potentially to the physician must be deposited
therein, but the portion belonging to the physician may be
withdrawn when due unless the right of the physician to receive
it is disputed by the patient, in which event the disputed
portion may not be withdrawn until the dispute is finally
resolved.

Every chiropractic physician shall maintain complete records of
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb259-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 259 2026
all funds, securities, and other properties of a patient coming
into the possession of the physician and render appropriate
accounts to the patient regarding them. In addition, every
chiropractic physician shall promptly pay or deliver to the
patient, as requested by the patient, the funds, securities, or
other properties in the possession of the physician which the
patient is entitled to receive.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb259-00